Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,110
Examination of title insurance agents.

The director may, during normal business hours, examine, audit, and inspect any and all books and records maintained by a title insurance agent under the provisions of the Title Insurance Agent Act. The title insurance agent shall reimburse the director for the expense of examination, audit, and inspection.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 33.